Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.76.020

Obstructing a law enforcement officer.

(1) A person is guilty of obstructing a law enforcement officer if the person willfully hinders, delays, or obstructs any law enforcement officer in the discharge of his or her official powers or duties.

(2) "Law enforcement officer" means any general authority, limited authority, or specially commissioned Washington peace officer or federal peace officer as those terms are defined in RCW 10.93.020, and other public officers who are responsible for enforcement of fire, building, zoning, and life and safety codes.

(3) Obstructing a law enforcement officer is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2001 c 308 s 3. Prior: 1995 c 285 s 33; 1994 c 196 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.76.020.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2001 c 308: See notes following RCW 9A.76.175.

Effective date—1995 c 285: See RCW 48.30A.900.